Hawaii statutes.
§132-15 Powers of director of labor and
industrial relations. Nothing contained in this chapter shall be construed
to deprive the director of labor and industrial relations of any power or
jurisdiction over or relative to the storage of explosives. [L 1917, c 115, pt
of §49; RL 1925, pt of §3463; RL 1935, pt of §6839; am L 1939, c 239, §1(17);
RL 1945, §8540; RL 1955, §184-17; HRS §132-17; am and ren L 1978, c 241,
§2(18)]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next